Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB507.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "medical training facility" and "midwife or nurse-midwife" in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Practice Act of 1985, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Medical training facility." A medical college, hospital or other institution which provides courses in the art and science of medicine and surgery and related subjects for the purpose of enabling a matriculant to qualify for a license to practice medicine and surgery, graduate medical training, [midwife] nurse-midwife certificate or physician assistant license.* * *"Midwife [or nurse-midwife]." An individual who is licensed as a [midwife] nurse-midwife under section 35 or a certified midwife under section 35.1 by the board.* * *Section 2. Section 12(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 12. Midwifery.* * *(b) Use of title.--A [midwife may ] nurse-midwife and a certified midwife may also use the title midwife[, nurse-midwife] or an appropriate abbreviation of [those titles] the title.* * *Section 3. Section 35(c) and (d) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 35. Nurse-midwife license.* * *(c) Authorization.--20250SB0507PN1158 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A nurse-midwife is authorized to practice midwifery [pursuant to a collaborative agreement with a physician and regulations promulgated by the board.] under the following conditions:(i) A nurse-midwife who is not an employee of a public or private health system, hospital, licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the nurse-midwife shall practice under a collaborative agreement with a physician or physician interdisciplinary group practice in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the board.(ii) A nurse-midwife who is an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the nurse-midwife shall obtain and maintain clinical staff privileges at the public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center and shall adhere to the established internal mechanisms at the facility of the public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center for quality improvement, consultation, collaboration or referral in accordance with the nurse-midwife's clinical practice privileges and the facility's policies and procedures as approved by the Department of Health.(2) A nurse-midwife who possesses a master's degree or its substantial equivalent and national certification may prescribe, dispense, order and administer drugs, including legend drugs and Schedule II through Schedule V controlled 20250SB0507PN1158 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 substances, as defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, provided that the nurse-midwife demonstrates to the board that:(i) The nurse-midwife has successfully completed at least 45 hours of coursework specific to advanced pharmacology at a level above that required by a professional nursing education program.(ii) As a condition of biennial license renewal by the board, a nurse-midwife shall complete the continuing education requirement as required by the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law. In case of a nurse-midwife who has prescriptive authority under this act, the continuing education required by The Professional Nursing Law shall include at least 16 hours in pharmacology in that two-year period.[(iii) The nurse-midwife acts in accordance with a collaborative agreement with a physician which shall at a minimum identify the categories of drugs from which the nurse-midwife may prescribe or dispense and the drugs which require referral, consultation or comanagement.](iv) The nurse-midwife acts in accordance with the following restrictions:(A) A nurse-midwife shall not prescribe, dispense, order or administer a controlled substance except for a woman's acute pain[.], for a woman's medication-assisted treatment for opioid use disorder or for primary gynecologic health conditions.(B) In the case of a Schedule II controlled substance for acute pain, the dose shall be limited 20250SB0507PN1158 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to 72 hours and shall not be extended except with the approval of [the] a collaborating physician.(C) In the case of a Schedule III or IV controlled substance, the prescription shall be limited to 30 days and shall only be refilled with the approval of [the] a collaborating physician.[(B) A nurse-midwife shall prescribe, dispense, order or administer psychotropic drugs only after consulting with the collaborating physician.](D) A nurse-midwife when working with a physician or physician group prescribing medication treatment for opioid use disorder may prescribe, dispense, order and administer United States Food and Drug Administration-approved prescription drugs, including buprenorphine, methadone and naltrexone, for medication-assisted treatment for opioid use disorders consistent with Federal laws and regulations.(3) A nurse-midwife may, [in accordance with a collaborative agreement with a physician and] consistent with the nurse-midwife's academic educational preparation and national certification, prescribe, dispense, order and administer:(i) Medical devices.(ii) Immunizing agents.(iii) Laboratory tests.(iv) Therapeutic, diagnostic and preventative measures.[(d) Collaborative agreements.--The physician with whom a nurse-midwife has a collaborative agreement shall have hospital 20250SB0507PN1158 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clinical privileges in the specialty area of the care for which the physician is providing collaborative services.](e) Consultation, collaboration or referral.--(1) A nurse-midwife who is an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the nurse-midwife shall identify deviations from normal and appropriate interventions, including the management of complications and emergencies utilizing consultation, collaboration or referral to or with a physician as indicated by the health status of a patient. A consultation between a nurse-midwife and a physician shall not alone establish a physician-patient relationship or any other legal relationship with the physician. A nurse-midwife shall be solely responsible for the services the nurse-midwife provides to a patient.(2) In order to maintain safe midwifery practice during a collaboration with a physician, a nurse-midwife shall, at a minimum, take all of the following actions:(i) Maintain a medical record for each patient.(ii) In the case of a transfer of care to another health care provider or facility, transfer a patient's medical records to the health care provider or facility.(f) Disclosures.--A nurse-midwife who is not an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the midwife shall disclose, verbally and in written form, the information specified in paragraphs (1) and 20250SB0507PN1158 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) to a prospective patient at the beginning of the professional relationship between nurse-midwife and the patient. The discussion must be documented by the use of a disclosure form. The patient shall sign and date the disclosure under this subsection at the same time the nurse-midwife and patient enter into an agreement for services. The nurse-midwife shall file the disclosure under this subsection in the patient's medical record. The disclosure shall include all the following information:(1) The nurse-midwife's name.(2) The patient's name, contact information and the name of the patient's primary care provider, if applicable.(3) An individual emergency plan established between the nurse-midwife and patient. The plan shall include all of the following:(i) The patient's name, address and telephone number.(ii) The arrangements for transport from the delivery site to a nearby hospital with obstetric services.(iii) The name, address and telephone number of the hospital with obstetric services that will be used for an emergency transfer.(iv) The name, address and telephone number of the hospital with obstetric services that will be used for a nonemergency transfer.(v) The name and telephone number of the collaborating physician or another physician, group practice, public or private health system or hospital with which the nurse-midwife has a collaborative 20250SB0507PN1158 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreement or which provides backup care or co-management care to the patient.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 35.1. Certified midwife license.(a) License.--A certified midwife license shall empower the licensee to practice midwifery in this Commonwealth as provided in this act. The board shall issue rules and promulgate regulations as may be necessary for the examination, licensing and proper conduct of the practice of midwifery.(b) Requirements.--An applicant for a certified midwife license must have completed an academic and clinical program of study in midwifery which has been approved by the board or an accrediting body recognized by the board.(c) Authorization.--(1) A certified midwife may practice midwifery under the following conditions:(i) A certified midwife who is not an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the midwife shall practice under a collaborative agreement with a physician or physician interdisciplinary group practice in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the board.(ii) A certified midwife who is an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the midwife shall obtain and maintain clinical staff privileges at the 20250SB0507PN1158 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center and shall adhere to the established internal mechanisms at the facility of the public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center for quality improvement, consultation, collaboration or referral in accordance with the certified midwife's clinical practice privileges and the facility's policies and procedures as approved by the Department of Health.(2) A certified midwife who possesses a master's degree or its substantial equivalent and national certification may prescribe, dispense, order and administer drugs, including legend drugs and Schedule II through Schedule V controlled substances, as defined in the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, if the certified midwife demonstrates to the board that:(i) The certified midwife has successfully completed at least 45 hours of coursework specific to advanced pharmacology during the individual's midwifery education.(ii) As a condition of biennial license renewal by the board, a certified midwife shall complete at least 16 hours of continuing education in pharmacology in that two-year period. Beginning with the license period designated by regulation, licensees shall be required to attend and complete 30 hours of mandatory continuing education during each two-year license period. Nationally certified education courses shall be considered as creditable, in addition to any other courses the board deems creditable toward meeting the requirements for continuing education.20250SB0507PN1158 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) An individual applying for the first time for licensure in this Commonwealth shall be exempted from the continuing education requirement for the biennial renewal period following initial licensure.(iv) The certified midwife acts in accordance with the following restrictions:(A) A certified midwife shall not prescribe, dispense, order or administer a controlled substance except for a woman's acute pain, for a woman's medication assisted treatment for opioid use disorder, or for primary gynecologic health conditions.(B) For a Schedule II controlled substance for acute pain, the dose shall be limited to 72 hours and shall not be extended except with the approval of a collaborating physician.(C) For a Schedule III or IV controlled substance, the prescription shall be limited to 30 days and shall only be refilled with the approval of a collaborating physician.(D) A certified midwife, when working with a physician or physician group prescribing medication treatment for opioid use disorder, may prescribe, dispense, order and administer United States Food and Drug Administration-approved prescription drugs, including buprenorphine, methadone and naltrexone, for medication-assisted treatment for opioid use disorders consistent with Federal laws and regulations.(3) A certified midwife may, consistent with the 20250SB0507PN1158 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified midwife's academic educational preparation and national certification, prescribe, dispense, order and administer:(i) Medical devices.(ii) Immunizing agents.(iii) Laboratory tests.(iv) Therapeutic, diagnostic and preventative measures.(d) Consultation, collaboration or referral.--(1) A certified midwife who is an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the midwife shall identify deviations from normal and appropriate interventions, including the management of complications and emergencies utilizing consultation, collaboration or referral to or with a physician as indicated by the health status of a patient. A consultation between a certified midwife and a physician shall not alone establish a physician-patient relationship or any other legal relationship with the physician. A certified midwife shall be solely responsible for the services the certified midwife provides to a patient.(2) In order to maintain safe midwifery practice during a collaboration with a physician, a certified midwife shall, at a minimum, take all of the following actions:(i) Maintain a medical record for each patient.(ii) In the case of a transfer of care to another health care provider or facility, transfer a patient's medical records to the health care provider or facility.20250SB0507PN1158 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Disclosures.--A certified midwife who is not an employee of a public or private health system, hospital or licensed birth center or part of an interdisciplinary group practice in which at least one physician practices in the specialty area of the care provided by the midwife shall disclose, verbally and in written form, the information specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) to a prospective patient at the beginning of the professional relationship between certified midwife and the patient. The discussion must be documented by the use of a disclosure form. The patient shall sign and date the disclosure under this subsection at the same time the nurse-midwife and patient enter into an agreement for services. The certified midwife shall file the disclosure under this subsection in the patient's medical record. The disclosure shall include all the following information:(1) The certified midwife's name.(2) The patient's name, contact information and the name of the patient's primary care provider, if applicable.(3) An individual emergency plan established between the certified midwife and patient. The plan shall include all of the following:(i) The patient's name, address and telephone number.(ii) The arrangements for transport from the delivery site to a nearby hospital with obstetrics services.(iii) The name, address and telephone number of the hospital with obstetric services that will be used for an emergency transfer.(iv) The name, address and telephone number of the 20250SB0507PN1158 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospital with obstetric services that will be used for a nonemergency transfer.(v) The name and telephone number of the collaborating physician or another physician, group practice, public or private health system or hospital with which the certified midwife has a collaborative agreement or which provides backup care or co-management care to the patient.(f) Mcare Act.--A certified midwife licensed under this section is subject to the same provisions as a certified nurse midwife is under the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. THE DEFINITIONS OF "MEDICAL TRAINING FACILITY" AND "MIDWIFE OR NURSE-MIDWIFE" IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985, ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"MEDICAL TRAINING FACILITY." A MEDICAL COLLEGE, HOSPITAL OR OTHER INSTITUTION WHICH PROVIDES COURSES IN THE ART AND SCIENCE OF MEDICINE AND SURGERY AND RELATED SUBJECTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENABLING A MATRICULANT TO QUALIFY FOR A LICENSE TO PRACTICE MEDICINE AND SURGERY, GRADUATE MEDICAL TRAINING, [MIDWIFE] NURSE-MIDWIFE OR CERTIFIED MIDWIFE CERTIFICATE OR PHYSICIAN 20250SB0507PN1158 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANT LICENSE.* * *["MIDWIFE OR NURSE-MIDWIFE." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED AS A MIDWIFE BY THE BOARD.]"MIDWIFE." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED AS A NURSE-MIDWIFE UNDER SECTION 35 OR A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE UNDER SECTION 35.1 BY THE BOARD.* * *SECTION 2. SECTIONS 12(B) AND 35(C)(1), (2)(III) AND (IV) AND (3) AND (D) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 12. MIDWIFERY.* * *(B) USE OF TITLE.--A [MIDWIFE MAY] NURSE-MIDWIFE AND A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE MAY ALSO USE THE TITLE MIDWIFE[, NURSE-MIDWIFE] OR AN APPROPRIATE ABBREVIATION OF [THOSE TITLES] THE TITLE.* * *SECTION 35. NURSE-MIDWIFE LICENSE.* * *(C) AUTHORIZATION.--(1) A NURSE-MIDWIFE IS AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MIDWIFERY PURSUANT TO A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP AND REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE BOARD.(2) A NURSE-MIDWIFE WHO POSSESSES A MASTER'S DEGREE OR ITS SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENT AND NATIONAL CERTIFICATION MAY PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER AND ADMINISTER DRUGS, INCLUDING LEGEND DRUGS AND SCHEDULE II THROUGH SCHEDULE V CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES, AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT, PROVIDED THAT THE NURSE-MIDWIFE DEMONSTRATES TO 20250SB0507PN1158 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE BOARD THAT:* * *(III) THE NURSE-MIDWIFE ACTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP WHICH SHALL AT A MINIMUM IDENTIFY THE CATEGORIES OF DRUGS FROM WHICH THE NURSE-MIDWIFE MAY PRESCRIBE OR DISPENSE AND THE DRUGS WHICH REQUIRE REFERRAL, CONSULTATION OR COMANAGEMENT.(IV) THE NURSE-MIDWIFE ACTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING RESTRICTIONS:(A) A NURSE-MIDWIFE SHALL NOT PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER OR ADMINISTER A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE EXCEPT FOR A WOMAN'S ACUTE PAIN[.], FOR A WOMAN'S MEDICATION FOR TREATMENT OF OPIOID USE DISORDER OR FOR PRIMARY GYNECOLOGIC HEALTH CONDITIONS. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) IN THE CASE OF A SCHEDULE II CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, THE DOSE SHALL BE LIMITED TO 72 HOURS AND SHALL NOT BE EXTENDED EXCEPT WITH THE APPROVAL OF [THE] A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(II) IN THE CASE OF A SCHEDULE III OR IV CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, THE PRESCRIPTION SHALL BE LIMITED TO 30 DAYS AND SHALL ONLY BE REFILLED WITH THE APPROVAL OF [THE] A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(B) A NURSE-MIDWIFE SHALL PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER OR ADMINISTER PSYCHOTROPIC DRUGS ONLY AFTER CONSULTING WITH [THE] A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(C) A NURSE-MIDWIFE, WHEN WORKING WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP , MAY PERFORM AND SIGN 20250SB0507PN1158 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE INITIAL ASSESSMENT OF METHADONE TREATMENT EVALUATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE LAW AND REGULATIONS, SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENT THAT ANY ORDER FOR METHADONE TREATMENT SHALL ONLY BE MADE BY A PHYSICIAN.(3) A NURSE-MIDWIFE MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP AND CONSISTENT WITH THE NURSE-MIDWIFE'S ACADEMIC EDUCATIONAL PREPARATION AND NATIONAL CERTIFICATION, PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER AND ADMINISTER:* * *(D) COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENTS.--THE PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP WITH WHOM A NURSE-MIDWIFE HAS A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT SHALL HAVE HOSPITAL CLINICAL PRIVILEGES IN THE SPECIALTY AREA OF THE CARE FOR WHICH THE PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP IS PROVIDING COLLABORATIVE SERVICES.SECTION 3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 35.1. CERTIFIED MIDWIFE LICENSE. (A) LICENSE.--A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE LICENSE SHALL AUTHORIZE THE LICENSEE TO PRACTICE MIDWIFERY IN THIS COMMONWEALTH AS PROVIDED IN THIS ACT. THE BOARD SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY FOR THE EXAMINATION, LICENSURE AND PROPER CONDUCT OF THE PRACTICE OF MIDWIFERY WITHIN TWO YEARS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(B) REQUIREMENTS.--AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE LICENSE SHALL HAVE COMPLETED AN ACADEMIC AND CLINICAL PROGRAM OF STUDY IN MIDWIFERY THAT HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE BOARD OR BY AN ACCREDITING BODY RECOGNIZED BY THE BOARD.(C) AUTHORIZATION.-- (1) A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE MAY PRACTICE MIDWIFERY PURSUANT 20250SB0507PN1158 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP AND REGULATIONS PROMULGATED BY THE BOARD.(2) A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE WHO POSSESSES A MASTER'S DEGREE OR ITS SUBSTANTIAL EQUIVALENT AND NATIONAL CERTIFICATION MAY PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER AND ADMINISTER DRUGS, INCLUDING LEGEND DRUGS AND SCHEDULE II THROUGH SCHEDULE V CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES, AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT, IF THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE COMPLIES WITH ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE SHALL DEMONSTRATE TO THE BOARD THAT THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED AT LEAST 45 HOURS OF COURSEWORK SPECIFIC TO ADVANCED PHARMACOLOGY DURING THE INDIVIDUAL'S MIDWIFERY EDUCATION.(II) AS A CONDITION OF BIENNIAL LICENSE RENEWAL, THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE SHALL, IN THE TWO YEARS PRIOR TO RENEWAL, COMPLETE AT LEAST 30 HOURS OF CONTINUING EDUCATION APPROVED BY THE BOARD. IN THE CASE OF A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE WITH PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY UNDER THIS ACT, THE 30 HOURS OF CONTINUING EDUCATION SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST 16 HOURS IN PHARMACOLOGY. BEGINNING WITH THE LICENSE PERIOD DESIGNATED BY REGULATION, LICENSEES SHALL BE REQUIRED TO COMPLETE 30 HOURS OF MANDATORY CONTINUING EDUCATION DURING EACH TWO-YEAR LICENSE PERIOD. NATIONALLY CERTIFIED EDUCATION COURSES SHALL BE CONSIDERED CREDITABLE, IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER COURSES THE BOARD DEEMS CREDITABLE TOWARD MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS FOR CONTINUING EDUCATION. AN INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR INITIAL LICENSURE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE 20250SB0507PN1158 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENT FOR THE BIENNIAL RENEWAL PERIOD FOLLOWING INITIAL LICENSURE.(III) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE SHALL ACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP, WHICH SHALL AT A MINIMUM IDENTIFY THE CATEGORIES OF DRUGS FROM WHICH THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE MAY PRESCRIBE OR DISPENSE AND THE DRUGS WHICH REQUIRE REFERRAL, CONSULTATION OR COMANAGEMENT.(IV) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE SHALL ACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FOLLOWING: (A) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE MAY NOT PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER OR ADMINISTER A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE EXCEPT FOR A WOMAN'S ACUTE PAIN, FOR A WOMAN'S MEDICATION FOR TREATMENT OF OPIOID USE DISORDER OR FOR PRIMARY GYNECOLOGIC HEALTH CONDITIONS. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(I) IN THE CASE OF A SCHEDULE II CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, THE DOSE SHALL BE LIMITED TO 72 HOURS AND SHALL NOT BE EXTENDED EXCEPT WITH THE APPROVAL OF A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(II) IN THE CASE OF A SCHEDULE III OR IV CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, THE PRESCRIPTION SHALL BE LIMITED TO 30 DAYS AND SHALL ONLY BE REFILLED WITH THE APPROVAL OF A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(B) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE SHALL PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER OR ADMINISTER PSYCHOTROPIC DRUGS ONLY AFTER CONSULTING WITH A COLLABORATING PHYSICIAN.(C) THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE, WHEN WORKING WITH A PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP , MAY PERFORM AND SIGN THE INITIAL ASSESSMENT OF METHADONE TREATMENT 20250SB0507PN1158 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EVALUATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE LAW AND REGULATIONS, SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENT THAT ANY ORDER FOR METHADONE TREATMENT SHALL ONLY BE MADE BY A PHYSICIAN.(3) A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE MAY, CONSISTENT WITH THE CERTIFIED MIDWIFE'S ACADEMIC EDUCATIONAL PREPARATION AND NATIONAL CERTIFICATION, PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, ORDER AND ADMINISTER:(I) MEDICAL DEVICES. (II) IMMUNIZING AGENTS. (III) LABORATORY TESTS. (IV) THERAPEUTIC, DIAGNOSTIC AND PREVENTATIVE MEASURES.(D) COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENTS.--THE PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP WITH WHOM A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE HAS A COLLABORATIVE AGREEMENT SHALL HAVE HOSPITAL CLINICAL PRIVILEGES IN THE SPECIALTY AREA OF THE CARE FOR WHICH THE PHYSICIAN OR PHYSICIAN GROUP IS PROVIDING COLLABORATIVE SERVICES.(E) MCARE ACT.--A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE LICENSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE SAME PROVISIONS AS A CERTIFIED NURSE-MIDWIFE UNDER THE ACT OF MARCH 20, 2002 (P.L.154, NO.13), KNOWN AS THE MEDICAL CARE AVAILABILITY AND REDUCTION OF ERROR (MCARE) ACT.SECTION 4. NOTHING IN THIS ACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE OR PROHIBIT THE PRACTICE OF LAY MIDWIVES, DIRECT-ENTRY MIDWIVES OR OTHER UNLICENSED BIRTH WORKERS WHO DO NOT HOLD A LICENSE UNDER THIS ACT. A LAY MIDWIFE, DIRECT-ENTRY MIDWIFE OR OTHER UNLICENSED BIRTH WORKER WHO DOES NOT HOLD A LICENSE UNDER THIS ACT SHALL NOT BE CONSIDERED LICENSED OR REGULATED BY THE COMMONWEALTH.20250SB0507PN1158 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 5. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0507PN1158 - 20 - 1